Washington statutes.
RCW 10.93.170

Applicants—Authorization to obtain information from prior employer.

A general authority Washington law enforcement agency or limited authority Washington law enforcement agency is prohibited from considering the application for any office, place, position, or employment within the agency if the applicant has not provided the agency a document, voluntarily and knowingly signed by the applicant, that authorizes each prior employer to release any and all information relating to the applicant's employment, and further releasing and holding harmless the agency and each prior employer from any and all liability that may potentially result from the release and use of such information provided.

[ 2021 c 323 s 30.]